Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2936
Notice of members' meetings.

(1) The limited cooperative association shall notify each member of the time, date, and place of any annual or special members' meeting not less than ten nor more than fifty days before the meeting.

(2) Unless the articles of organization or bylaws otherwise provide, notice of an annual members' meeting need not include a description of the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

(3) Notice of a special members' meeting shall include a description of the purpose or purposes of the meeting as contained in the demand under section 21-2935 or as voted upon by the board of directors under such section.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 36.